Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.200

License procedures, requirements, fees. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 62; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 420.]

PDFRCW 18.79.200

License procedures, requirements, fees. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

An applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2024 c 239 s 10; 1996 c 191 s 62; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 420.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.